Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202659-1623
Act, how cited.

Sections 59-1601 to 59-1623 shall be known and may be cited as the Consumer Protection Act.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 30;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 33;

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB934, § 3.